Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-3] Jurisdiction to try certain
personnel. (a) Each person discharged from the state military forces who
is later charged with having fraudulently obtained the person's discharge is,
subject to section 124A-68, subject to trial by court-martial on that charge
and is after apprehension subject to this chapter while in the custody of the
military for that trial. Upon conviction of that charge the person is subject
to trial by court-martial for all offenses under this chapter committed before
the fraudulent discharge.

(b) No person who has deserted from the state
military forces may be relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this
chapter by virtue of a separation from any later period of service. [L 1982, c
171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next